Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3415
Effect of transfer on death deed at transferor's death.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the transfer on death deed, in this section, or in sections 30-2313 to 30-2319 or section 30-2354, on the death of the transferor, the following rules apply to property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed and owned by the transferor at death:

(1) Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection, the interest in the property is transferred to the designated beneficiary in accordance with the deed;

(2) The interest of a designated beneficiary is contingent on the designated beneficiary surviving the transferor by one hundred twenty hours. If the deed provides for a different survival period, the deed shall determine the survival requirement for designated beneficiaries. The interest of a designated beneficiary that fails to survive the transferor by one hundred twenty hours or as otherwise provided in the deed shall be treated as if the designated beneficiary predeceased the transferor;

(3) Subject to subdivision (4) of this subsection, concurrent interests are transferred to the beneficiaries in equal and undivided shares with no right of survivorship; and

(4) If the transferor has identified two or more designated beneficiaries to receive concurrent interests in the property, the share of one which fails for any reason is transferred to the other, or to the others in proportion to the interest of each in the remaining part of the property held concurrently.

(b) A beneficiary takes the property subject to all conveyances, encumbrances, assignments, contracts, mortgages, liens, and other interests to which the property is subject at the transferor's death.

(c) If a transferor is a joint owner and is:

(1) Survived by one or more other joint owners, the property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed belongs to the surviving joint owner or owners with right of survivorship; or

(2) The last surviving joint owner, the transfer on death deed of the last surviving joint owner transferor is effective.

(d) A transfer on death deed transfers property without covenant or warranty of title even if the deed contains a contrary provision.

(e) If after recording a transfer on death deed the transferor is divorced or his or her marriage is dissolved or annulled, the divorce, dissolution, or annulment revokes any disposition or appointment of property made by the transfer on death deed as provided in section 30-2333.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB517, § 7.